Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1147.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2-5-119 of Title 27A, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
No individual, corporation, organization, or government entity
shall construct, operate, or maintain facilities designed for the
capture or storage of carbon dioxide collected from the atmosphere
in this state. A violation of this section shall be considered an
endangerment to the citizens of this state and the violator shall be
subject to the penalties outlined in Section 2-3-504 of Title 27A of
the Oklahoma Statutes.
Req. No. 10097 Page 1

SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-10097 JBH 12/31/24





















Req. No. 10097 Page 2